New York, session 2025-2026, A7442.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 219 of the laws of 2003, amending the 2 education law relating to publishers or manufacturers providing printed 3 instructional materials for college students with disabilities, as 4 amended by chapter 283 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 § 2. This act shall take effect August 15, 2004 and shall expire and 7 be deemed repealed [21] 24 years after such effective date. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11352-01-5